Utah statutes.
70A-8-202.    Issuer's responsibility and defenses -- Notice of defect or
defense.
(1)  Even against a purchaser for value and without notice, the terms of a
certificated security include terms stated on the certificate and terms made
part of the security by reference on the certificate to another instrument,
indenture, or document or to a constitution, statute, ordinance, rule,
regulation, order, or the like, to the extent the terms referred to do not
conflict with terms stated on the certificate.  A reference under this
subsection does not of itself charge a purchaser for value with notice of a
defect going to the validity of the security, even if the certificate
expressly states that a person accepting it admits notice.  The terms of an
uncertificated security include those stated in any instrument, indenture, or
document or in a constitution, statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, or
the like, pursuant to which the security is issued.
(2)  The following rules apply if an issuer asserts that a security is not
valid:
(a)  A security other than one issued by a government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, even though issued with a defect
going to its validity, is valid in the hands of a purchaser for value and
without notice of the particular defect unless the defect involves a violation
of a constitutional provision.  In that case, the security is valid in the
hands of a purchaser for value and without notice of the defect, other than
one who takes by original issue.
(b)  Subsection (2)(a) applies to an issuer that is a government or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality only if there has been
substantial compliance with the legal requirements governing the issue or the
issuer has received a substantial consideration for the issue as a whole or
for the particular security and a stated purpose of the issue is one for which
the issuer has power to borrow money or issue the security.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-8-205, lack of genuineness of
a certificated security is a complete defense, even against a purchaser for
value and without notice.
(4)  All other defenses of the issuer of a security, including nondelivery and
conditional delivery of a certificated security, are ineffective against a
purchaser for value who has taken the certificated security without notice of
the particular defense.
(5)  This section does not affect the right of a party to cancel a contract
for a security "when, as and if issued" or "when distributed" in the event of
a material change in the character of the security that is the subject of the
contract or in the plan or arrangement pursuant to which the security is to be
issued or distributed.
(6)  If a security is held by a securities intermediary against whom an
entitlement holder has a security entitlement with respect to the security,
the issuer may not assert any defense that the issuer could not assert if the
entitlement holder held the security directly.
